Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 25 Dower and Curtesy

33-25-1.
Dower and curtesy abolished.

The right of a widow to common law and/or statutory dower in the estate of her husband and the right of a husband to common law and/or statutory curtesy in the estate of his wife are hereby abolished.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 26, § 1.

33-25-2.
Life estate to spouse.

Whenever any person shall die leaving a husband or wife surviving, the real estate owned by the decedent in fee simple at his or her death shall descend and pass to the husband or wife for his or her natural life subject, however, to any encumbrances existing at death; provided that the liability, if any, of the decedent to discharge the encumbrance or encumbrances shall not be impaired. The provisions of §§

33-1-1

and

33-1-2

shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter and of §

33-1-6

.

For purposes of this section, any real estate conveyed by the decedent prior to his or her death, with or without monetary consideration, shall not be subject to the life estate granted in subsection (a) if the instrument or instruments evidencing such conveyance were recorded in the records of land evidence in the city or town where the real estate is located prior to the death of the decedent. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require that the instrument or instruments evidencing the conveyance must be recorded prior to the death of the decedent to be valid and thus not subject to the life estate contained herein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 444, § 1.

33-25-3.
Life estate precedence.

The life estates provided in this chapter shall take effect notwithstanding any provisions of the will of the decedent, except as provided in §

33-25-4

, and shall take precedence over any claims of creditors of the decedent or decedent’s estate, except claims secured by lien or any form of encumbrance on the real estate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 26, § 1.

33-25-4.
Election by surviving spouse — Recording of waiver and claim.

If any estate, real or personal, be devised or bequeathed to a surviving spouse, the devise or bequest shall bar the life estate unless the surviving spouse shall, within six (6) months after the date of the first publication of the qualifications of the fiduciary of the estate of the deceased spouse, file in the probate court granting probate a written statement waiving and renouncing the devise and bequest and claiming his or her life estate in the real estate of the decedent. If any of this real estate be located in any city or town other than that in which the will of the decedent is probated, the waiver and claim shall also be filed in the records of deeds in each city and town where the real estate is located.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 198, § 1.

33-25-5.
Payment of value of life estate in lieu thereof.

In any case where real estate shall be ordered sold by any court, except where otherwise specifically provided, or real estate is taken under authority of law, and it shall appear that a surviving husband or wife is or may be entitled under this chapter to a life estate in the property, the court having jurisdiction of the proceedings may, in its discretion, upon the petition of the surviving husband or wife as the case may be, and after notice, determine the present value of the life estate and order it to be paid to him or her in lieu of the life estate out of the proceeds of the sale or taking.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 26, § 1.

33-25-6.
Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to rights of common law and/or statutory dower or common law and/or statutory curtesy as they existed prior to April 17, 1978, but, if it should be held that this chapter cannot constitutionally apply thereto, it shall nevertheless be fully effective with regard to the estate of all persons who shall die after April 17, 1978 any other law or statute notwithstanding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 26, § 1.